vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > An toàn cho bé > Phụ kiện cửa chắn trẻ em và vật nuôi: Đồ chặn cửa; Bộ dụng cụ nối dài; Cơ cấu khóa; Bộ dụng cụ lắp đặt; Đế gắn tường
pt-BR: Infantil > Segurança de bebês > Acessórios para grades de segurança: Batente de portas; Kits de extensão; Mecanismos de bloqueio; Kits de montagem; Protetores de parede
nb: Baby og barn > Babysikkerhet > Tilbehør for baby- og husdyrgrinder: Dørstoppere; Forlengersett; Låsemekanismer; Monteringssett; Veggkopper
en: Baby & Toddler > Baby Safety > Baby & Pet Gate Accessories: Door Stoppers; Extension Kits; Locking Mechanisms; Mounting Kits; Wall Cups
ja: ベビー用品 > ベビー用安全グッズ > セーフティゲート関連用品: ドアストッパー; エクステンションキット; ロック装置; 取り付けキット; ウォールカップ
sk-SK: Bábätká > Bezpečnosť detí > Príslušenstvo k zábranám pre deti a domácich miláčikov: Zarážky dverí; Rozširujúce súpravy; Uzamykacie mechanizmy; Montážne súpravy; Nástenné manžety
ru: Товары для детей > Безопасность детей > Аксессуары для защитных барьеров для детей и домашних животных: Ограничители открывания; Модули расширения и дополнительные секции; Запирающие механизмы; Комплекты крепежа; Настенные чашечки
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Babysicherheit > Zubehör für Baby- & Haustierschutzgitter: Türstopper; Erweiterungskits; Sicherungsmechanismen; Montagekits; Wandschalen
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Varnost dojenčka > Dodatki za otroške varnostne ograje in ograje za hišne ljubljenčke: Zaustavljalci vrat; Kompleti podaljškov; Zaklepni mehanizmi; Kompleti za montažo; Podložke za steno
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Accessoires de sécurité pour bébés > Accessoires pour barrières de sécurité: Butoirs de porte; Kits d’extension; Mécanismes de verrouillage; Kits de montage; Fermoirs muraux
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 婴儿安全用品 > 婴儿/宠物安全门栏附件: 门堵; 扩展套件; 锁定装置; 安装套件; 壁杯
ko: 영유아 > 영유아 안전용품 > 영유아/반려동물용 게이트 부대용품: 도어 스토퍼; 연장용 키트; 잠금장치; 설치용 키트; 벽 보호대
da: Baby og småbørn > Baby – sikkerhedsudstyr > Tilbehør til sikkerhedslåge for børn og kæledyr: Dørstoppere; Udvidelsessæt; Låsemekanismer; Monteringssæt; Vægkopper
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Protección para el bebé > Accesorios para puertas de seguridad: Topes de puerta; Kits de extensión; Mecanismos de bloqueo; Kits de montaje; Tazas de pared
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Kūdikių sauga > Vartelių kūdikiams ir naminiams gyvūnams priedai: Durų stabdikliai; Ilginimo rinkiniai; Užrakinimo mechanizmai; Montavimo rinkiniai; Sieniniai puodeliai
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Bezpieczeństwo niemowląt > Akcesoria do bramek ochronnych dla dzieci i zwierząt: Blokady drzwi; Zestawy rozszerzające; Mechanizmy blokujące; Zestawy do montażu; Odboje ścienne
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Bebek Güvenliği > Bebek ve Evcil Hayvan Kapısı Aksesuarları: Kapı Stoperleri; Uzatma Kitleri; Kilitleme Mekanizmaları; Montaj Kitleri; Duvar Bardakları
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 嬰兒安全 > 嬰兒/寵物安全小門配件: 門擋器; 延長工具包; 鎖定裝置; 安裝工具包; 杯型門擋
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Βρεφική ασφάλεια > Αξεσουάρ πόρτας για βρέφη & κατοικίδια ζώα: Στοπ για πόρτες; Σετ προεκτάσεων; Μηχανισμοί κλειδώματος; Κιτ τοποθέτησης; Κύπελλα στήριξης για τοίχους
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Безопасност на бебето > Аксесоари за врати за бебета и домашни любимци: Стопери за врати; Комплекти за разширение; Заключващи механизми; Монтажни комплекти; Тапи за стена
sv: Baby och småbarn > Babysäkerhet > Tillbehör till barn- och djurgrindar: Dörrstopp; Förlängningsenheter; Låsmekanismer; Monteringsenheter; Väggkoppar
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Siguranța bebelușului > Accesorii pentru poartă copii și animale de companie: Opritoare pentru uși; Truse extensie; Mecanisme de blocare; Seturi de montare; Ventuze de perete
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Segurança do bebé > Acessórios de barreiras de segurança para aninhais e bebés: Batente de porta; Kits de extensão; Mecanismos de bloqueio; Kits de montagem; Copos de parede
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Sigurnost bebe > Pribor za ogradice za bebe i ljubimce: Stoperi za vrata; Kompleti produžetaka; Mehanizmi za zaključavanje; Setovi za montažu; Zidna kopča
nl: Baby en peuter > Babyveiligheid > Accessoires voor beveiligingshekken: Deurstoppers; Uitbreidingskits; Vergrendelingsmechanismen; Montagekits; Wandbekers
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > อุปกรณ์ความปลอดภัยสำหรับทารก > อุปกรณ์ประตูสำหรับทารกและสัตว์เลี้ยง: ที่กั้นประตู; ชุดขยาย; กลไกการล็อค; ชุดติดตั้ง; ถ้วยติดผนัง
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Bababiztonság > Baba- és háziállatkapu-kiegészítők: Ajtómegállítók; Kiterjesztési készletek; Zárómechanizmusok; Rögzítőkészletek; Fali csészék
cs: Děti a kojenci > Potřeby pro bezpečnost dětí > Bezpečnostní zábrany – příslušenství: Dveřní zarážky; Rozšiřovací sady; Zamykací mechanismy; Instalační sady; Ochranné podložky na stěnu
it: Bebè e bimbi > Sicurezza dei bebè > Accessori per cancelletti di sicurezza: Fermaporte; Kit di estensione; Meccanismi di bloccaggio; Kit di montaggio; Tazze a parete
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Vauvan turvallisuus > Vauva- ja lemmikkiporttien lisätarvikkeet: Ovipysäyttimet; Laajennussarjat; Lukitusmekanismit; Kiinnityssarjat; Seinäkupit